Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.161

School construction assistance calculations for shared or colocated facilities—Rules.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to ensure that a host school district is not penalized for the entirety of a shared or colocated facility when calculations for state school construction assistance are made.

[ 2012 c 245 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 2012 c 245 directed that this section be added to chapter 28A.300 RCW. This section has been added to chapter 28A.525 RCW, which relates more directly to school construction funding.